Illinois, session 104th, HB1210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-22 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-22)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-22)7    Sec. 27-22. Required high school courses. 8    (a) (Blank). 9    (b) (Blank).10    (c) (Blank).11    (d) (Blank).12    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 13to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 149th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 15successfully complete all of the following courses:16        (1) Four years of language arts.17        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 18    which must be English and the other of which may be English 19    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 20    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 21    graduation requirements. 22        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 23    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and   HB1210- 2 -LRB104 03529 LNS 13552 b1    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 2    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 3    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 4    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 5    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 6    path.7        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 8    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 9    of a course that includes intensive instruction in 10    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 11    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 12    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 13        (4) Two years of science.14        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 15    year must be history of the United States or a combination 16    of history of the United States and American government 17    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 18    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 19    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 20    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 21    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 22    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 23    content shall focus on government institutions, the 24    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 25    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. 26    School districts may utilize private funding available for   HB1210- 3 -LRB104 03529 LNS 13552 b1    the purposes of offering civics education. Beginning with 2    pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school 3    year, one semester, or part of one semester, may include a 4    financial literacy course.5        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 6    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 7    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 8    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 9    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 10    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 11    requirement under this subdivision (6). 12    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 13prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 14entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 15requirements, successfully complete all of the following 16courses: 17        (1) Four years of language arts.18        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 19    which must be English and the other of which may be English 20    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 21    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other 22    graduation requirements.23        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 24    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 25    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 26    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry   HB1210- 4 -LRB104 03529 LNS 13552 b1    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 2    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 3    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 4    path.5        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 6    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English, 7    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 8    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 9    requirements. 10        (4) Two years of laboratory science.11        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 12    year must be history of the United States or a combination 13    of history of the United States and American government 14    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 15    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 16    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 17    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 18    Civics course content shall focus on government 19    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 20    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 21    democratic process. School districts may utilize private 22    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 23    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 24    include a financial literacy course.25        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 26    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include   HB1210- 5 -LRB104 03529 LNS 13552 b1    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 2    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 3    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 4    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 5    requirement under this subdivision (6). 6    (e-10) (Blank). Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, 7as a prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each 8pupil entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 9requirements, successfully complete 2 years of foreign 10language courses, which may include American Sign Language. A 11pupil may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy 12the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5). 13    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 14school districts of standards for writing-intensive 15coursework. 16    (f-5) If a school district offers an Advanced Placement 17computer science course to high school students, then the 18school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 19high school mathematics course and must denote on the 20student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 21science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative 22course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of 23subsection (e) of this Section. 24    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 25the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 26or to students with disabilities whose course of study is   HB1210- 6 -LRB104 03529 LNS 13552 b1determined by an individualized education program. 2    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the 39th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 4or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 5determined by an individualized education program. 6    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 7pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 8prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 9course of study is determined by an individualized education 10program. 11    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 12grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 13students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 14by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 15not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 16school year or a prior school year or to students with 17disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 18individualized education program. 19    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 20provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-22.05 of this Code and 21the Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act. 22    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify 23the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in 24grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 25to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 26Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act.   HB1210- 7 -LRB104 03529 LNS 13552 b1(Source: P.A. 102-366, eff. 8-13-21; 102-551, eff. 1-1-22; 2102-864, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 38-2-24.)